North Carolina, session 2025, SB397.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to Durham County the
nonrecurring sum of four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000) for the 2025-2026
fiscal year to be used for capital improvements to, and repairs and renovations needs due to
deferred maintenance on, (i) public school buildings and athletic fields and (ii) other public
school facilities.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S397-v-1*